Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 5.4
FOSTER CARE PREVENTION SERVICES

Section

26-5.4-101. Legislative declaration.

The federal "Family First Prevention Services Act" was enacted on February 9, 2018. In order to comply with the provisions of the "Family First Prevention Services Act", the general assembly finds it is necessary to update current statutes to enable Colorado to provide enhanced support to children, youth, and their families in order to prevent foster care placements.

It is the intent of the general assembly to treat children and youth in-home or with a kin caregiver when doing so serves the safety, permanent placement, and well-being of the child or youth.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2456, § 1, effective August 2.

26-5.4-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 5.4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Foster care prevention services" means mental health and substance abuse prevention and treatment services, in-home parent skill-based programs, kinship navigator programs, and other programs eligible for reimbursement under the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act" that are trauma-informed, promising, supported or well-supported, and provided to prevent foster care placement.

"Qualified residential treatment program" means a licensed and accredited program that has a trauma-informed treatment model that is designed to address the child's or youth's needs, including clinical needs, as appropriate, of children and youth with serious emotional or behavioral disorders or disturbances in accordance with the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 672 (k)(4), and is able to implement the treatment identified for the child or youth by the assessment of the child or youth required in section 19-1-115 (4)(e)(I).

"Trauma-informed" refers to the services to be provided to or on behalf of a child or youth under an organizational structure and treatment framework that involves understanding, recognizing, and responding to the effects of all types of trauma in accordance with recognized principles of a trauma-informed approach and trauma-specific interventions to address trauma's consequences and facilitate healing.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2456, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1056, § 63, effective June 30.

26-5.4-103. Foster care prevention services program - rules.

The state department is authorized to include in the state's five-year Title IV-E prevention plan, as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 671, the establishment and implementation of a foster care prevention services program for families with children and youth who are candidates for foster care but who can safely remain at home or in a kinship placement with receipt of services, including children and youth who, without intervention, risk involvement with the child welfare system as established by rule of the state board. The state department shall promulgate rules setting forth procedures regarding the provision of these services.

Nothing in this article 5.4 shall prevent the state department from complying with federal requirements for a foster care prevention services program in order for the state to qualify for federal money under the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2457, § 1, effective August 2.

26-5.4-104. Eligibility requirements - period of eligibility - services available - rules.

Children and youth and their parents, legal custodians, legal guardians, or kin caregivers are eligible for foster care prevention services when their needs for services are directly related to the safety, permanent placement, or well-being of the child or youth, or to prevent the child or youth from entering the foster care system.

Foster care prevention services may be authorized for up to twelve months per episode of eligibility.

Foster care prevention services provided pursuant to this article 5.4 must be defined in the child's or youth's prevention plan, as defined through rules promulgated by the state board.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2457, § 1, effective August 2.

26-5.4-105. Implementation of article - federal authorization - request for funding.

The state department shall implement the provisions of this article 5.4 and the provisions of title 19 and this title 26 executing the utilization of foster care prevention services and qualified residential treatment programs when the federal government approves Colorado's five-year Title IV-E prevention plan, at which time the department may submit a budget request to the joint budget committee for necessary funding to implement the plan.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2457, § 1, effective August 2.

26-5.4-106. Foster care prevention services - provision of services - rights and remedies - exchange of information.

A county department of human or social services may provide both child welfare and prevention services, including but not limited to foster care prevention services, as defined in section 26-5.4-102, to a family and its children.

Nothing in this section affects any existing rights of a child or youth, including those eligible for foster care prevention services, or any existing rights of a parent who is eligible for foster care prevention services.

An entity providing foster care prevention services shall ensure that all information obtained and exchanged is confidential as required pursuant to federal and state laws regarding confidentiality.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-162), ch. 221, p. 1091, § 7, effective July 2.